New Jersey, session 221, S1273.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Secretary of Agriculture, upon receiving proof that at least 20 percent of the food served by a school comes from farm products grown and produced in New Jersey, may allow the school to use the words New Jersey Farm Fresh School in any promotional materials or description of the school.  For purposes of this section, school means any public or nonpublic school and any public or nonpublic institution of higher education. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.